errortag-src/numeral-sme-lex.txt
LEXICON CIEZAOVCCATLOHKAI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:eža%>#ovccát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:eža%>#ovccát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:eža%>#ovccát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:eža%>#ovccát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:eža%>#ovccát#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:eža%>#ovccát#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:eža%>#ovccát#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:eža%>#ovccát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:eža%>jn#ovccát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:eža%>n#ovccát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:eža%>#ovccát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:eža%>jn#ovccát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:eža%>n#ovccát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:eža%>#ovccát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:eža%>#ovccát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:eža%>#ovccát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:eža%>#ovccát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:eža%>jn#ovccát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:eža%>#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:eža%>#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:eža%>#ovccát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:eža%>jn#ovccát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:eža%>#ovccát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:eža%>#ovccát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Attr:eža%>t#ovccát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:eža%>jd#ovccát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:eža%>jn#ovccát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:eža%>t#ovccát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:eža%>jd#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:eža%>jd#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:eža%>jd#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Com+Use/Sub:eža%>jd#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Ess:eža%>t#ovccát#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON CIEZALOGATLOHKAI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:eža%>#logát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:eža%>#logát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:eža%>#logát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:eža%>#logát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:eža%>#logát#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:eža%>#logát#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:eža%>#logát#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:eža%>#logát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:eža%>jn#logát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:eža%>n#logát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:eža%>#logát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:eža%>jn#logát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:eža%>n#logát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:eža%>#logát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:eža%>#logát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:eža%>#logát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:eža%>#logát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:eža%>jn#logát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:eža%>#logát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:eža%>#logát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:eža%>#logát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:eža%>jn#logát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:eža%>#logát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:eža%>#logát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Attr:eža%>t#logát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:eža%>jd#logát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:eža%>jn#logát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:eža%>t#logát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:eža%>jd#logát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:eža%>jd#logát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:eža%>jd#logát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Com+Use/Sub:eža%>jd#logát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Ess:eža%>t#logát#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON CIEZALOGI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:ehča%>#lohki%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom:eža%>#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom:ehča%>#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Ess:ehča%>n#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:ehča%>n#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:eža%>#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:eža%>#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:eža%>#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:eža%>#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:eža%>#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:eža%>jn#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:eža%>n#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:eža%>#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:eža%>jn#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:eža%>n#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:eža%>#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:eža%>#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:eža%>t#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:eža%>#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:eža%>jn#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:eža%>jd9#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:eža%>jd9#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:eža%>jde#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:eža%>jn#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:eža%>jd9#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:eža%>jgujn#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:eža%>t#lot%> K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Sg+Attr:eža%>jd#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:eža%>t#lot%> K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Sg+Attr:eža%>jd#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:eža%>#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:eža%>#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:eža%>#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:eža%>#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Com+Use/Sub:eža%>#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Loc:eža%>#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Ess:eža%>#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:eža%>t#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:eža%>jd#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:eža%>jd#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:eža%>jd#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Com+Use/Sub:eža%>jd#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Loc:eža%>jn#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Ess:eža%>t#logi%>n K ;


LEXICON GAVCCI
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Use/NG:%> K ; ! 
 +Num+Sg+Nom:%>X4 K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:%>X4 K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4 K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:»X4# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X3j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:%>X5jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>X5jgujn K ;

LEXICON GAVCCINUPPELOHKAI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:%>X4#nuppe#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4#nuppe#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4#nuppe#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:%>X4#nuppe#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#nuppe#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#nuppe#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#nuppe#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X5jn#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>n#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X5jn#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>n#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#nuppe#logivs K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>X4#nuppe#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4#nuppe#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#nuppe#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#nuppe#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X4#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X4#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:%>X4#nuppe#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#nuppe#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>X4#nuppe#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X4#nuppe#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Attr:%>X4t#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:%>X5jd#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr:%>X5jn#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t#nuppe#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Com+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Ess:%>X4t#nuppe#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON 11TO99F
čieža#ovccát#lohkái:či CIEZAOVCCATLOHKAI ;
čieža#logát#lohkái:či CIEZALOGATLOHKAI ;
gieža#ovccát#lohkái:gi CIEZAOVCCATLOHKAI ;
gieža#logát#lohkái:gi CIEZALOGATLOHKAI ;
gávcci#nuppe#lohkái:gák'ci GAVCCINUPPELOHKAI ;
ovcci#nuppe#lohkái:ok'ci GAVCCINUPPELOHKAI ;
LEXICON 111TO119
čieža#ovccát#lohkái:či CIEZAOVCCATLOHKAI ;
čieža#logát#lohkái:či CIEZALOGATLOHKAI ;
gieža#ovccát#lohkái:gi CIEZAOVCCATLOHKAI ;
gieža#logát#lohkái:gi CIEZALOGATLOHKAI ;
gávcci#nuppe#lohkái:gák'ci GAVCCINUPPELOHKAI ;
ovcci#nuppe#lohkái:ok'ci GAVCCINUPPELOHKAI ;
LEXICON CUODI
čuođi#čieža#logi:čuođi#či CIEZALOGI ;
čuođi#gieža#logi:čuođi#gi CIEZALOGI ;
okta#čuohti#čieža#logi:okta#čuohti#či CIEZALOGI ;
okta#čuohti#gieža#logi:okta#čuohti#gi CIEZALOGI ;
čuohti#čieža#logi:čuohti#či CIEZALOGI ;
čuohti#gieža#logi:čuohti#gi CIEZALOGI ;
